Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1009.
do enact as follows:SB1009,11Section 1. 97.01 (10) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1009,2,12297.01 (10) (a) “Milk” “Milk,” except in the phrase “lab-grown milk,” means the 3lacteal secretion, practically free of colostrum, obtained by the complete milking of 4one or more healthy cows, goats, or sheep. Milk from cows shall contain not less 5than 3 percent of milk fat, and not less than 8.25 percent of milk solids not fat. Milk 6from cows may be standardized by the addition or removal of cream or by the 7addition of concentrated milk, dry whole milk, skim milk, concentrated skim milk, 8or nonfat milk. Milk from cows may also be standardized by removing water 9through reverse osmosis or other nonthermal methods and adding potable water. 10When standardized, milk from cows sold in final package form shall contain not less 11than 3.25 percent of milk fat, and not less than 8.25 percent of milk solids not fat. 12Milk may be homogenized.SB1009,213Section 2. 97.26 of the statutes is created to read:SB1009,2,161497.26 Labeling certain food products as milk. (1) In this section, “lab-15grown milk” means a liquid that replicates milk but is not harvested from a 16mammal.SB1009,2,1817(2) No person may sell or offer for sale a packaged food product that contains 18lab-grown milk unless all of the following apply:SB1009,2,2119(a) The packaged food product is labeled with the phrase “lab-grown milk” in 20type or lettering at least as large as any other type or lettering on the packaged food 21product’s label in a color of print that clearly contrasts with its background.SB1009,3,21(b) The packaged food product’s label includes a complete and accurate list of 2the ingredients contained in the enclosed food product.SB1009,3,63(c) If there is more than one separately packaged component enclosed in the 4packaged food product, each separately packaged component that contains lab-5grown milk bears the phrase “lab-grown milk” in type or lettering not smaller than 620-point type.SB1009,3,97(3) No person may sell or offer for sale at a public eating place a food product 8that contains lab-grown milk as a substitute for milk unless such food product is 9ordered by the customer.SB1009,3,1410(4) No person may serve a food product that contains lab-grown milk as a 11substitute for milk to students, patients, or inmates of any state institutions, except 12if ordered by the institution superintendent when necessary for the health of a 13specific patient or inmate, if directed by the physician in charge of the patient or 14inmate.SB1009,3,1815(5) A person that violates this section may be fined not less than $100 nor 16more than $500 or imprisoned for not more than 3 months, or both, for a first 17offense and may be fined not less than $500 nor more than $1,000 or imprisoned for 18not less than 6 months nor more than one year, or both, for each subsequent offense.SB1009,319Section 3. Effective date.SB1009,3,2020(1) This act takes effect on January 1, 2027.SB1009,3,2121